Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-918
Contact with victims of spouse abuse and families; confidentiality; violation; penalty.

Under the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act, strict confidence shall be observed in all contact with victims of spouse abuse and their families. Any record, report, or files maintained by the department pursuant to the act shall be confidential, except that the department may release statistical information, while not revealing names. Violation of this section shall be a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 18;

Laws 1997, LB 829, § 3.